Hawaii statutes.
§143-8 Seizure and redemption of unlicensed
dogs. Except where licensing requirements are dispensed with, every
officer shall seize any unlicensed dog found running at large or found upon any
public highway, street, alley, court, place, square, or grounds, or upon any
unfenced lot, or not within a sufficient enclosure, whether in the immediate
presence of the owner or otherwise, and confine it in a pound or any suitable
enclosure for a period of forty-eight hours, during which time it shall be
subject to redemption by its owner by payment of the license due, if any, and a
penalty to be set by each county council; provided that until and unless
provided by ordinance the penalty shall be $2.50. If not so redeemed, the dog
shall be sold by the officer for the amount of the license and penalty due, or
as much more as can be obtained therefor; provided that the officer may neuter
or require the neutering of the dog prior to sale, and if not so sold it shall
be humanely destroyed. The owner of any unlicensed dog impounded and not
claimed within forty-eight hours as provided in this section, may redeem the
dog at any time before sale or destruction of the dog by paying to the officer,
in addition to the amount of the license and penalty, an impoundment fee per day
for the number of days over two days the dog was impounded. Each county
council shall have the power to fix the impoundment fee for dogs; provided that
until and unless otherwise provided by ordinance the impoundment fee shall be
$2.50 a day. Of the money so received the amount of the license fee shall be
paid to the director of finance and the balance shall be retained by the
officer to defray the expenses of collecting, keeping, and feeding the dog. [L
1941, c 268, §7; RL 1945, §7157; RL 1955, §156-8; HRS §143-8; am L 1973, c 146,
§3; am L 1983, c 227, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next